Washington statutes.
RCWWebsite Search Term

Print

RCWs > Dispositions > Title 15 > Chapter 15.13

Chapter 15.13.210 RCW Dispositions

HORTICULTURAL PLANTS AND FACILITIES — INSPECTION AND LICENSING

Sections

15.13.010
Definitions.

[1967 c 240 § 16; 1961 c 221 § 1.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.020
Director to enforce chapter — Rules.

[1967 c 240 § 17; 1961 c 221 § 2.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.030
Licenses — Fees — Expiration date.

[1967 c 240 § 18; 1961 c 221 § 3.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.040
Application for license — Form — Contents.

[1961 c 221 § 4.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.045

[1967 c 240 § 20.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.050
Application for agent's license to name principal and carry endorsement.

[1961 c 221 § 5.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.060
Reciprocity.

[1961 c 221 § 6.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.070
Denial, suspension, revocation of license — Procedure.

[1961 c 221 § 7.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.080
Subpoenas — Witness fees.

[1961 c 221 § 8.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.090
Request for inspector's services during shipping season — Costs — Certificate.

[1961 c 221 § 9.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.095

[1967 c 240 § 21.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.100
Inspection prior to sale, shipment, transportation — Subsequent infection.

[1961 c 221 § 10.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.110
Shipment or delivery into state without inspection prohibited — Certificate to accompany shipment.

[1961 c 221 § 11.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.120
Container or contents to be marked or tagged — Improper marking.

[1961 c 221 § 12.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.130
Unlawful acts.

[1961 c 221 § 13.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.140
Order of condemnation and destruction — Judicial stay.

[1961 c 221 § 14.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.150
Injunctions to prevent violations.

[1961 c 221 § 15.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.160
Chapter cumulative and nonexclusive.

[1961 c 221 § 16.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.170
Existing liabilities not affected by chapter.

[1961 c 221 § 17.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.180
Prior consistent rules adopted and continued.

[1961 c 221 § 18.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.190
Penalty.

[1961 c 221 § 19.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.200
Deposit of fees in nursery inspection account — Use — Disposition of fees collected under prior law.

[1967 c 240 § 19; 1961 c 221 § 20.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.210
Cooperation, agreements with governmental agencies.

[1961 c 221 § 21.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.330
Advisory committee — Qualifications for members.

[1971 ex.s. c 33 § 9.]

Repealed by 1983 1st ex.s. c 73 § 8.

15.13.350
Denial, suspension, revocation of license — Grounds.

[1990 c 261 § 7; 1989 c 175 § 43; 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 11.]

Repealed by 2000 c 144 § 36.

15.13.460
Prior rules adopted and continued.

[1971 ex.s. c 33 § 24.]

Decodified pursuant to 2000 c 144 § 32.

15.13.900
Severability — 1961 c 221.

[1961 c 221 § 22.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.910
Effective date — 1961 c 221.

[1961 c 221 § 23.]

Repealed by 1971 ex.s. c 33 § 30.

15.13.930
Existing liabilities not affected.

[1971 ex.s. c 33 § 23.]

Decodified pursuant to 2000 c 144 § 32.

15.13.940
Severability-1971 ex.s. c 33.

[1971 ex.s. c 33 § 28.]

Decodified by the code reviser, July 2016.

15.13.950
Effective date — 1971 ex.s. c 33.

[1971 ex.s. c 33 § 29.]

Decodified pursuant to 2000 c 144 § 32.